Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB66.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 160.180 is amended to read as follows:
[(1) As used in this section, "relative" means father, mother, brother, sister, husband,
wife, son, and daughter.]
(1)[(2)] A person shall only be eligible for membership on a board of education if the
person:
(a) Has attained the age of twenty-four (24) years;
(b) Has been a citizen of Kentucky for at least three (3) years preceding the
election and is a voter of the district for which he or she is elected;
(c) Has completed at least the twelfth grade or has been issued a High School
Equivalency Diploma, as evidenced by:
1. An affidavit signed under penalty of perjury certifying completion of the
twelfth grade or the equivalent that has been filed with the nominating
petition required by KRS 118.315; or
2. A transcript evidencing completion of the twelfth grade or the results of
a twelfth grade equivalency examination that has been filed with the
nominating petition required by KRS 118.315;
(d) Does not hold any elective federal, state, county, or city office;
(e) Is not an employee of the board[,] at the time of his or her election[, directly
or indirectly interested in the sale to the board of books, stationery, or any
other property, materials, supplies, equipment, or services for which school
funds are expended]; and
(f) Has not been removed from membership on a board of education for cause[;
and
(g) Does not have a relative employed by the school district, in the case of a
person elected after July 13, 1990. This shall not apply to a board member
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 216
holding office on July 13, 1990, whose relative was not initially hired by the
district during the tenure of the board member].
(2)[(3)] (a) A member of a board of education shall be subject to removal from
office pursuant to KRS 415.050 and 415.060 if, after the election the member:
1. Becomes interested in any [contract with or ]claims against the board or
becomes an employee thereof[, of the kind mentioned in subsection
(2)(e) of this section];
2. Moves his or her residence from the division for which he or she was
chosen;
3. Attempts to influence the employment of any school employee, except
the superintendent or school board attorney;
4. Is convicted of a felony;
5. Performs acts of malfeasance in performance of duties prescribed by
law;
6. Willfully misuses, converts, or misappropriates public property or
funds;[ or]
7. Does anything that would render the member ineligible for reelection;
8. Fails to abstain from any board votes where the member is directly or
indirectly interested; or
9. Violates his or her board code of ethics pursuant to subsection (3) of
Section 2 of this Act.
(b) In accordance with KRS 7.410, the Office of Education Accountability shall
have the duty and responsibility to investigate current local board of education
members for allegations of conduct prohibited by paragraph (a) of this
subsection. After review and investigation, the Office of Education
Accountability shall refer appropriate matters to the Attorney General.
(3)[(4)] A member of a board of education shall be eligible for reelection unless he or
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 216
she becomes disqualified.
(4)[(5)] The annual in-service training requirements for all members of boards of
education in office as of December 31, 2014, shall be as follows:
(a) Twelve (12) hours for members with zero to three (3) years of experience;
(b) Eight (8) hours for members with four (4) to seven (7) years of experience;
and
(c) Four (4) hours for members with eight (8) or more years of experience.
The Kentucky Board of Education shall identify the criteria for fulfilling this
requirement.
(5)[(6)] (a) For all members of boards of education who begin their initial service
on or after January 1, 2015, the in-service training requirements shall be:
1. Twelve (12) hours for members with zero to eight (8) years of
experience each year, which shall include a minimum of:
a. One (1) hour of ethics training each year; and
b. One (1) hour of open meetings and open records training within
the first twelve (12) months of initial service and at least once
every four (4) years thereafter; and
2. Eight (8) hours for members with more than eight (8) years of
experience each year, which shall include a minimum of:
a. One (1) hour of ethics training each year; and
b. One (1) hour of open meetings and open records training at least
once every four (4) years.
(b) Training topics for members under this subsection with less than two (2) years
of consecutive service shall include three (3) hours of finance and one (1)
hour of superintendent evaluation within the first two (2) years of service. The
Kentucky Board of Education shall identify criteria for fulfilling this
requirement.
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 216
Section 2. KRS 160.290 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each board of education shall have general control and management of the public
schools in its district and may establish schools and provide for courses and other
services as it deems necessary for the promotion of education and the general health
and welfare of pupils, consistent with the administrative regulations of the
Kentucky Board of Education. Each board shall have control and management of
all school funds and all public school property of its district and may use its funds
and property to promote public education. Each board shall exercise generally all
powers prescribed by law in the administration of its public school system, appoint
the superintendent of schools, and fix the compensation of employees.
(2) Each board shall make and adopt, and may amend or repeal, rules, regulations, and
bylaws for its meetings and proceedings for the management of the schools and
school property of the district, for the transaction of its business, and for the
qualification and duties of employees and the conduct of pupils. The rules,
regulations, and bylaws made by a board of education shall be consistent with the
general school laws of the state and shall be binding on the board of education and
parties dealing with it until amended or repealed by an affirmative vote of a
majority of the members of the board. The rules, regulations, and bylaws shall be
spread on the minutes of the board and be open to the public. The rules, regulations,
and bylaws may include the use of reverse auctions as defined in KRS 45A.070 in
the procurement of goods and leases.
(3) (a) Each board shall make and adopt, and may amend, a board code of ethics
that shall apply to all members of the board. The code of ethics shall include
but not be limited to provisions which set forth for the members of the
board:
1. Standards of conduct; and
2. Requirements for the creation and annual filing of financial
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:48 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 216
disclosure statements, which shall be open to public inspection.
(b) A board's code of ethics shall not include any policies that prohibit
individuals related to board members from being employed by the school
district in which the member serves.
(4)[(3)] Local boards of education electing to enter into agreements pursuant to the
Interlocal Cooperation Act, KRS 65.210 to 65.300, with other local boards of
education to establish consortia to provide services in accordance with the
Kentucky Education Reform Act of 1990, 1990 Ky. Acts Ch. 476, may transfer real
or personal property to the consortia without receiving fair market value
compensation. The joint or cooperative action may employ employees transferred
from employment of a local board of education, and the employees shall retain their
eligibility for the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System. The chief state school
officer, under administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education, may
allot funding to an interlocal cooperative board created by two (2) or more local
school districts pursuant to KRS 65.210 to 65.300 to provide educational services
for the mutual advantage of the students in the representative districts. All statutes
and administrative regulations that apply to the use of these funds in local school
districts shall also apply to cooperative boards.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/7/2025 2:48 PM Jacketed